Utah statutes.
73-5a-402.   Standard operating plans required.

The owner of each dam shall prepare a standard operating plan for the dam.  In the case of a dam in operation prior to May 1, 1991, the standard operating plan shall be submitted to the state engineer for his approval by May 1, 1994.  In the case of any dam beginning operations on or after May 1, 1991, the standard operating plan shall be submitted to the state engineer for his approval prior to the final inspection.



Enacted by Chapter 319, 1990 General Session

